Maine, session 132, LD1436.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §12004-I, sub-§74-A, as amended by PL 1993, c. 566, §1, is
further amended to read:
74-A.
Public Safety E-9-1-1 9-1-1 Council Expenses Only 25 MRSA §2925
Sec. 2. 17-A MRSA §509, sub-§1, ¶A, as amended by PL 2023, c. 430, §1, is
further amended to read:
A. The person knowingly gives or causes to be given false information to a law
enforcement officer, an emergency communications center or the enhanced 9-1-1
services established in Title 25, chapter 352 with the intent of inducing the officer, the
emergency communications center or any other emergency services personnel to
believe that a crime has been committed or that another has committed a crime,
knowing the information to be false;
Sec. 3. 17-A MRSA §509, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 430, §1, is
further amended to read:
B. The person knowingly gives or causes to be given false information to a law
enforcement officer, a member of a firefighting agency, including a volunteer fire
department, an emergency communications center, the enhanced 9-1-1 services
established in Title 25, chapter 352 or any other person knowing that the other person
is likely to communicate the information to a law enforcement officer, a member of a
firefighting agency, an emergency communications center or any other emergency
services personnel concerning a fire, explosive or other similar substance that is
capable of endangering the safety of persons, knowing that the information is false, or
knowing that the person has no information relating to the fire, explosive or other
similar substance; or
Sec. 4. 17-A MRSA §509, sub-§1, ¶C, as amended by PL 2023, c. 430, §1, is
further amended to read:
Page 1 - 132LR0556(03)

C. The person knowingly gives or causes to be given false information concerning an
emergency to an ambulance service, an emergency communications center, the
enhanced 9-1-1 services established in Title 25, chapter 352, any other emergency
services personnel or a government agency or public utility that deals with emergencies
involving danger to life or property, with the intent of inducing the service, personnel,
agency, center or utility to respond to the reported emergency, knowing the information
to be false.
Sec. 5. 25 MRSA §2921, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 1987, c. 840, §3, is amended to
read:
1. Automatic location identification. "Automatic location identification" means an
enhanced a 9-1-1 service capability that enables the automatic display of information
defining the geographical location of the telephone used to place a 9-1-1 call.
Sec. 6. 25 MRSA §2921, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 1987, c. 840, §3, is amended to
read:
2. Automatic number identification. "Automatic number identification" means an
enhanced a 9-1-1 service capability that enables the automatic display of the 7-digit number
used to place a 9-1-1 call.
Sec. 7. 25 MRSA §2921, sub-§2-A, as amended by PL 2003, c. 359, §1, is further
amended to read:
2-A. Bureau. "Bureau" means the Emergency Services Communication Bureau
within the Public Utilities Commission, which is responsible for the statewide
implementation and management of E-9-1-1 9-1-1.
Sec. 8. 25 MRSA §2921, sub-§2-B, as enacted by PL 2007, c. 68, §1, is amended
to read:
2-B. Cellular or wireless telecommunications service. "Cellular or wireless
telecommunications service" means commercial mobile service as defined in 47 United
States Code, Section 332(d) , regardless of when payment is required for that service.
Sec. 9. 25 MRSA §2921, sub-§5-A, as enacted by PL 2007, c. 226, §1, is amended
to read:
5-A. Enhanced 9-1-1 access-only service. "Enhanced "9-1-1 access-only service" or
"E-9-1-1 access-only service" means the provision of E-9-1-1 9-1-1 access to a residential
telephone customer's premises when telephone service to the premises has been otherwise
suspended or disconnected.
Sec. 10. 25 MRSA §2921, sub-§6, as amended by PL 2013, c. 119, §1, is repealed
and the following enacted in its place:
6. 9-1-1 services. "9-1-1 services" or "9-1-1" means the delivery of 9-1-1 calls to the
proper public safety answering points with the automatic location identification and
automatic number identification of an entity requesting emergency services. "9-1-1
services" or "9-1-1" includes Internet protocol enabled services.
Sec. 11. 25 MRSA §2921, sub-§6-D is enacted to read:
Page 2 - 132LR0556(03)

6-D. Originating service provider. "Originating service provider" means an entity
that provides service to an end user that may be used to originate voice or nonvoice 9-1-1
calls for assistance and that connects to the 9-1-1 system for the purposes of delivering
9-1-1 services, including, but not limited to, the delivery of wireline, wireless and voice
over Internet protocol services, to a public safety answering point.
Sec. 12. 25 MRSA §2921, sub-§7, as amended by PL 1993, c. 566, §3, is further
amended to read:
7. Public safety answering point. "Public safety answering point" means a facility
with enhanced 9-1-1 capability, operated on a 24-hour basis, assigned the responsibility of
receiving 9-1-1 calls and, as appropriate, the physical or virtual entity where 9-1-1 calls are
received that is responsible for directly dispatching emergency services or, through transfer
routing or relay routing, passing 9-1-1 calls to public or private safety agencies.
Sec. 13. 25 MRSA §2921, sub-§13, as amended by PL 2009, c. 400, §1 and
affected by c. 400, §15, is further amended to read:
13. Prepaid wireless telecommunications service. "Prepaid wireless
telecommunications service" means a cellular or wireless telecommunications service that
allows a caller to dial 9-1-1 to access the E-9-1-1 9-1-1 system, which service must be paid
for in advance and is sold in predetermined units or dollars that declines with use in a
known amount.
Sec. 14. 25 MRSA §2921, sub-§17, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 339, §4, is amended
to read:
17. 9-1-1 call. "9-1-1 call" means any use of enhanced 9-1-1 services initiated by any
means or medium, including, but not limited to, voice calls and text messaging.
Sec. 15. 25 MRSA §2923-A, as amended by PL 2011, c. 505, §3, is further amended
to read:
§2923-A. Requirements of municipalities, plantations, counties or unorganized
territories
Each municipality, plantation, county or unorganized territory that does not have a
public safety answering point shall contract with an entity that does have a public safety
answering point, which may be the department, for receiving 9-1-1 calls and, as
appropriate, directly dispatching emergency services or, through transfer routing or relay
routing, passing 9-1-1 calls to public or private safety agencies that dispatch emergency
services. If a municipality, plantation, county or unorganized territory without a public
safety answering point does not enter into such an agreement, the department shall serve
as the public safety answering point for that municipality, plantation, county or
unorganized territory and the municipality, plantation, county or unorganized territory shall
pay the department for the provision of those services. Fees received by the department
pursuant to this section must be deposited in the Consolidated Emergency Communications
Fund established in section 1534. If a fee assessed to a municipality, plantation, county or
unorganized territory for services provided pursuant to an agreement under this section or
by the department is based in whole or in part on population, the population of the
municipality, plantation, county or unorganized territory may not include persons held at a
correctional facility, as defined in Title 34‑A, section 1001, subsection 6, within the
municipality, plantation, county or unorganized territory.
Page 3 - 132LR0556(03)

Sec. 16. 25 MRSA §2923-B, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 186, §1, is amended
to read:
1. Notice. A public safety answering point shall provide notice to the bureau prior to
discontinuing service to a municipality, plantation, county or unorganized territory. A
public safety answering point may not provide the notice under this subsection less than
one year prior to the date that the public safety answering point discontinues service, unless
the bureau finds reasonable grounds to authorize a shorter period of time for the
notification. If appropriate, the bureau shall notify the department of the notice of
discontinuing service received by the bureau from a public safety answering point.
Sec. 17. 25 MRSA §2923-C, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 609, §3, is amended to read:
§2923-C. Cost reporting
1. Reporting requirements. Annually, on a date prescribed by the bureau Public
Utilities Commission by rule, a public safety answering point and dispatch center shall each
provide the bureau with a report of the costs incurred by the public safety answering point
or dispatch center for the provision of enhanced 9-1-1 services.
2. Rules. The bureau Public Utilities Commission shall adopt rules to implement this
section. The rules must establish requirements for the report provided by a public safety
answering point and dispatch center pursuant to subsection 1, including, at a minimum:
A. The manner by which the report must be submitted to the bureau;
B. The specific cost components for the provision of enhanced 9-1-1 services to be
included in the report; and
C. The date by which the report must be submitted.
Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules pursuant to Title 5,
chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
Sec. 18. 25 MRSA §2925, as amended by PL 2021, c. 348, §37, is further amended
by amending the section headnote to read:
§2925. E-9-1-1 9-1-1 Council
Sec. 19. 25 MRSA §2925, first ¶, as amended by PL 1993, c. 566, §8, is further
amended to read:
The E-9-1-1 9-1-1 Council, established in Title 5, section 12004‑I, subsection 74‑A,
and referred to in this section as "the council," shall advise and assist the bureau in the
implementation of the E-9-1-1 9-1-1 system.
Sec. 20. 25 MRSA §2925, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2021, c. 348, §37, is further
amended to read:
1. Membership. The E-9-1-1 Council council is composed of 17 members; one
appointed by the Public Utilities Commission; one appointed by the Commissioner of
Public Safety; and 15 appointed by the Governor, including one who is a municipal official
nominated by the statewide association of municipalities, one county official nominated by
a statewide association of county commissioners, one who is a chief of a municipal police
department nominated by the statewide association of chiefs of police, one who is the chief
of a municipal fire department nominated by the statewide association of fire chiefs, one
Page 4 - 132LR0556(03)

who is a county sheriff nominated by the statewide association of sheriffs, one who
represents small telephone companies, one who represents the largest provider of local
exchange telephone services, one who represents cellular or wireless service providers, one
who represents a direct provider of emergency medical services, one who is a dispatcher
nominated by the statewide association of dispatchers, one who is a member of a volunteer
fire department, one to represent persons who are deaf and hard of hearing and 3 to
represent the public-at-large. Each member may name a designee who may attend meetings
of the council and act on that member's behalf in council proceedings.
Sec. 21. 25 MRSA §2925, sub-§6, as amended by PL 2009, c. 219, §1, is further
amended to read:
6. Duties. The council has the following duties.
A. The council shall advise the bureau on activities relating to the establishment of an
E-9-1-1 a 9-1-1 system.
B. The council shall review and comment on rules proposed by the bureau Public
Utilities Commission under this chapter.
C. The council shall assist the bureau in providing public information about the
implementation and operation of the E-9-1-1 9-1-1 system.
D. The council shall assist the bureau in responding to and resolving service-related
complaints and issues regarding the E-9-1-1 9-1-1 system.
Sec. 22. 25 MRSA §2926, as amended by PL 2023, c. 186, §2, is further amended
to read:
§2926. Emergency Services Communication Bureau
1. Bureau established. The Emergency Services Communication Bureau is
established within the Public Utilities Commission to implement and manage E-9-1-1
9-1-1, including the deployment of E-9-1-1 9-1-1 service using emerging communications
technologies, including, but not limited to, Internet protocol enabled services, that are
capable of connecting users to public safety answering points.
1-A. Quality assurance. The bureau shall develop and implement a quality assurance
program to audit and monitor compliance with emergency dispatching standards, practices
and procedures of public safety answering points.
2. System design. In consultation with the E-9-1-1 9-1-1 Council, established in Title
5, section 12004-I, subsection 74-A, the bureau shall develop all necessary system
elements, standards and cost estimates necessary to provide for the installation and
operation of a statewide E-9-1-1 9-1-1 system, including, but not limited to, the following:
A. Development of network design specifications;
B. Development of minimum public safety answering point requirements including
24-hour operation; emergency backup power; secured communication areas; separate
administrative phone lines for nonemergency calls; call recording and playback
equipment; TDD equipment, as defined in Title 35‑A, section 8702, subsection 6;
maximum call handling times; and minimum mandatory staff training requirements for
9-1-1 call answering and dispatching;
Page 5 - 132LR0556(03)

C. After consultation with the affected public and private safety agency officials,
identification of appropriate public safety answering point sites based on consideration
of the existing dispatching capabilities of public and private safety agencies, the
expressed preferences of municipalities throughout the State and overall system cost;
D. Identification of appropriate technology for system networks, public safety
answering point equipment and data base database requirements;
E. Procedures for developing and maintaining address and routing data bases database;
F. Procedures for cooperation and coordination with telephone utilities and
municipalities for implementation and maintenance;
G. Standards and procedures to establish the confidentiality and prevent the
dissemination of reports and records handled by public safety answering points and of
the bureau;
H. Estimates of the cost of establishing an operational E-9-1-1 9-1-1 system;
I. Procedures for collecting and administering the necessary funds for E-9-1-1 9-1-1;
and
J. Standards and procedures for developing and maintaining the system databases and
for ensuring the confidentiality of those databases pursuant to section 2929.
2-A. Goal. To the extent possible, the bureau shall establish a total of between 16 and
24 public safety answering points. The bureau shall seek to coordinate any reduction in
the number of public safety answering points to achieve this goal with any contractual
obligations it may have or may enter into that are or could be affected by that reduction.
Prior to implementing a reduction in the number of public safety answering points, the
bureau shall make a finding regarding the need for the reduction based on an evaluation of
the costs and benefits of the reduction, taking into account impacts on ratepayers, each of
the affected municipalities municipality, plantation, county or unorganized territory and
the State.
2-B. Exceptions. Notwithstanding subsection 2‑A, the bureau may authorize the
establishment of a public safety answering point on a determination that a public safety
answering point is necessary to ensure public safety and access to E-9-1-1 9-1-1 services.
3. Rulemaking. The bureau Public Utilities Commission shall adopt by rule its the
bureau's standards, specifications and procedures developed under subsection 2,
paragraphs A to F after consultation with the E-9-1-1 9-1-1 Council and following at least
3 public hearings geographically dispersed throughout the State.
4. Technical assistance. The bureau may provide support for the development of
street address information sufficient to support E-9-1-1 9-1-1 services. The bureau shall
provide technical assistance to any municipality in the development of street address
information at the request of the interested municipality, plantation, county or unorganized
territory.
5. Call answering coverage. The bureau is not required to provide call answering
coverage in counties or municipalities that choose not to participate in the E-9-1-1 system.
6. System databases. The system databases, wherever located or stored, are the
property of the bureau and their confidentiality is governed by section 2929.
Page 6 - 132LR0556(03)

Sec. 23. 25 MRSA §2927, as amended by PL 2023, c. 609, §4, is repealed.
Sec. 24. 25 MRSA §2927-A is enacted to read:
§2927-A. 9-1-1 funding
1. Funding. The activities authorized under this chapter are funded through:
A. The statewide 9-1-1 surcharge under subsection 2 levied on:
(1) Each residential and business telephone exchange line, including private
branch exchange lines and Centrex lines;
(2) Semipublic coin and public access lines;
(3) Customers of interconnected voice over Internet protocol service; and
(4) Customers of cellular or wireless telecommunications service that is not a
prepaid wireless telecommunications service. A surcharge may not be levied under
this subparagraph with respect to customers of cellular or wireless
telecommunications service that is supported by federal universal service support
funds pursuant to 47 Code of Federal Regulations, Part 54; and
B. The statewide prepaid wireless telecommunications service 9-1-1 surcharge under
subsection 3 levied on prepaid wireless telecommunications service customers. A
surcharge may not be levied under this paragraph with respect to prepaid wireless
telecommunications service supported by federal universal service support funds
pursuant to 47 Code of Federal Regulations, Part 54, except that a surcharge may be
levied under this paragraph on transactions in which the customer directly purchases
optional services that are not supported by federal universal service support funds.
2. Statewide 9-1-1 surcharge. The statewide 9-1-1 surcharge is governed by this
subsection.
A. The Public Utilities Commission shall establish the statewide 9-1-1 surcharge,
except that the statewide 9-1-1 surcharge may not exceed 35¢ per month per line or
number. The commission shall establish the statewide 9-1-1 surcharge by rule or
through other commission proceedings. The statewide 9-1-1 surcharge may not be
imposed on more than 25 lines or numbers per customer billing account.
B. The statewide 9-1-1 surcharge must be collected from the customer according to
subsection 1, paragraph A on a monthly basis by each local exchange telephone utility,
cellular or wireless telecommunications service provider and interconnected voice over
Internet protocol service provider and be shown separately as a statewide 9-1-1
surcharge on the customer's bill, when practicable. In circumstances in which
separately showing the statewide 9-1-1 surcharge on a customer's bill is not practicable,
the local exchange telephone utility, cellular or wireless telecommunications service
provider or interconnected voice over Internet protocol service provider must make the
information regarding the amount of the 9-1-1 surcharge available to the customer in
another manner.
C. The place of residence of cellular or wireless telecommunications service customers
who are not prepaid wireless telecommunications service customers must be
determined according to the sourcing rules for mobile telecommunications services as
set forth in Title 36, section 2556.
Page 7 - 132LR0556(03)

3. Statewide prepaid wireless telecommunications service 9-1-1 surcharge. The
statewide prepaid wireless telecommunications service 9-1-1 surcharge, referred to in this
subsection as "the prepaid wireless 9-1-1 surcharge," is governed by this subsection.
The Public Utilities Commission shall establish the prepaid wireless 9-1-1 surcharge,
except that the prepaid wireless 9-1-1 surcharge may not exceed 35¢ per retail transaction.
The commission shall establish the prepaid wireless 9-1-1 surcharge by rule or through
other commission proceedings.
4. 9-1-1 funding obligation; limitation. The statewide 9-1-1 surcharge imposed by
subsection 2 and the prepaid wireless 9-1-1 surcharge imposed by subsection 3 are the only
9-1-1 funding obligations imposed with respect to telecommunications service in this State,
and another tax, fee, surcharge or other charge may not be imposed by this State, a political
subdivision of this State or an intergovernmental agency for funding 9-1-1 purposes on any
telecommunications service with respect to the sale, purchase, use or provision of that
telecommunications service.
5. Surcharge remittance. Each local exchange telephone utility, cellular or wireless
telecommunications service provider and interconnected voice over Internet protocol
service provider shall remit the statewide 9-1-1 surcharge revenues collected from
customers pursuant to subsection 1 on a monthly basis and within one month of the month
collected, except that a utility or provider whose average monthly surcharge remittance
payment for the prior calendar year is less than $5,000 shall remit the 9-1-1 surcharge
revenues on a quarterly basis, to the Treasurer of State for deposit in a separate account
known as and referred to in this section as "the 9-1-1 fund." Each telephone utility or
service provider required to remit statewide 9-1-1 surcharge revenues shall provide, on a
form approved by the bureau, supporting data, including, but not limited to, the following:
A. The calculation used to arrive at the surcharge remittance amount;
B. The calculation used to arrive at the uncollectible amount of surcharge;
C. The total surcharge;
D. The month and year or the quarter and year for which a surcharge is remitted;
E. The legal name and telephone number of the telephone utility or service provider
and, if applicable, the parent company name, address and telephone number; and
F. The name and telephone number of the person who prepared the form.
Prepaid wireless 9-1-1 surcharges collected by sellers must be remitted to the State Tax
Assessor in accordance with Title 35‑A, section 7104‑C.
6. Expenditure of funds. All costs incurred by the bureau under this subsection must
be paid from the 9-1-1 fund.
A. The bureau may use the revenues in the 9-1-1 fund to:
(1) Fund staff;
(2) Defray the costs associated with the implementation, operation and
management of 9-1-1, including the deployment of 9-1-1 service using emerging
communications technologies, including, but not limited to, Internet protocol
enabled services, that are capable of connecting users to public safety answering
points; and
Page 8 - 132LR0556(03)

(3) Defray the costs, including necessary staffing costs, of the Emergency Medical
Services' Board in implementing the requirements of Title 32, section 85‑A
through the transfer of funds to the Other Special Revenue Funds, Emergency
Medical Services account within the Department of Public Safety.
B. The bureau shall use the revenues in the 9-1-1 fund to:
(1) Provide free training courses for emergency medical dispatchers, as defined in
Title 32, section 85‑A, subsection 1, paragraph D, to assist public safety answering
points in meeting the requirements of Title 32, section 85‑A;
(2) Provide each public safety answering point a sufficient number of approved
Emergency Medical Dispatch Priority Reference System documents in printed or
electronic format, as determined by the bureau pursuant to Title 32, section 85‑A;
(3) Provide public safety answering points dispatcher training consistent with the
protocols, necessary software and printed support materials to assist public safety
answering points in the adoption and implementation of standardized dispatch
protocols for answering fire 9-1-1 calls;
(4) Provide quality assurance training and software to assist public safety
answering points in ensuring compliance with the standardized dispatch protocols
for answering fire 9-1-1 calls;
(5) Provide, subject to available funds not to exceed $1,000,000 per biennium,
grants for nonrecurring costs to:
(a) Dispatch centers associated with the consolidation of the dispatch centers
into public safety answering points;
(b) Consolidate 2 or more public safety answering points and dispatch centers
into a new regional public safety answering point and dispatch center; or
(c) Transfer a public safety answering point and all of its dispatch services to
another existing public safety answering point; and
(6) Contract with one or more 3rd‑party vendors to provide quality assurance
review in accordance with rules adopted pursuant to subsection 11 and Title 32,
section 85‑A, subsection 2 related to the provision of emergency medical dispatch
services and answering fire 9-1-1 calls by public safety answering points.
7. Unexpended funds; interest. The amount of the 9-1-1 fund not expended by the
end of the fiscal year may not lapse but must be carried forward to be expended for the
purposes specified in this chapter in succeeding fiscal years. The Treasurer of State shall
credit all interest on fund balances to the 9-1-1 fund.
8. Legislative annual report. The bureau shall include in the Public Utilities
Commission's annual report pursuant to Title 35‑A, section 120, subsection 7 to the joint
standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over utilities and energy matters:
A. The bureau's planned expenditures for the year and use of funds for the previous
year;
B. The statewide 9-1-1 surcharge collected under this section;
C. The bureau's recommended statewide 9-1-1 surcharge for the coming year;
Page 9 - 132LR0556(03)

D. The bureau's recommendations for amending existing and enacting new laws to
improve the 9-1-1 system; and
E. The performance of each of the public safety answering points in the State during
the previous calendar year, including the results of the bureau's quality assurance
program audits under section 2926, subsection 1‑A and any recommendations of the
bureau relating to the emergency dispatching standards, practices and procedures of
public safety answering points.
9. Committee recommendations; budget. The joint standing committee of the
Legislature having jurisdiction over utilities and energy matters shall make
recommendations to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction
over appropriations and financial affairs regarding all expenditures from the 9-1-1 fund.
10. Violations. A telephone utility, a cellular or wireless telecommunications service
provider, including a prepaid wireless telephone service provider, or an interconnected
voice over Internet protocol service provider subject to this section that intentionally and
knowingly fails to remit the statewide 9-1-1 surcharge revenues collected under this section
commits a civil violation for which a fine of not more than $500 may be adjudged for each
day that payment is not made after the due date.
11. Rules. The Public Utilities Commission shall adopt rules necessary to implement
the provisions of this section. Rules adopted under this subsection are routine technical
rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
Sec. 25. 25 MRSA §2929, sub-§1, ¶A, as enacted by PL 1997, c. 291, §3, is
amended to read:
A. The names, addresses and telephone numbers of persons listed in E-9-1-1 9-1-1
databases;
Sec. 26. 25 MRSA §2929, sub-§1, ¶D, as amended by PL 2015, c. 153, §1, is
further amended to read:
D. Personally identifying information of and any medical information about a person
receiving emergency services through the E-9-1-1 9-1-1 system; or
Sec. 27. 25 MRSA §2929, sub-§2, ¶D, as enacted by PL 1997, c. 291, §3, is
amended to read:
D. The bureau director may disclose confidential information to public safety
answering points, public or private safety agencies, emergency responders or others
within the E-9-1-1 9-1-1 system to the extent necessary to implement and manage the
E-9-1-1 9-1-1 system.
Sec. 28. 25 MRSA §2929, sub-§4, ¶A, as enacted by PL 1997, c. 291, §3, is
amended to read:
A. To persons within the E-9-1-1 9-1-1 system to the extent necessary to implement
and manage the E-9-1-1 9-1-1 system;
Sec. 29. 25 MRSA §2929, sub-§5, as enacted by PL 1997, c. 291, §3, is amended
to read:
5. Unlisted telephone numbers. The name and address associated with the number
of a telephone company customer with an unlisted telephone number may be furnished to
Page 10 - 132LR0556(03)

the E-9-1-1 9-1-1 system for processing a request for E-9-1-1 9-1-1 services from that
number and for the provision of emergency services resulting from the request.
Sec. 30. 25 MRSA §2930, as amended by PL 2007, c. 504, §1, is further amended
to read:
§2930. Immunity
1. Governmental entity. Subject to all the limitations and exceptions provided under
the Maine Tort Claims Act, Title 14, chapter 741, a government governmental entity is
immune from tort liability for property damages, bodily injury or death resulting from acts
or omissions occurring in developing, establishing, implementing, maintaining or operating
the E-9-1-1 9-1-1 system.
2. Telecommunications providers. A telecommunications provider assisting in the
implementation and operation of the statewide E-9-1-1 9-1-1 system, including, but not
limited to, the development, establishment and maintenance of the E-9-1-1 9-1-1 system,
is subject to tort liability:
A. For property damages, bodily injury or death resulting from any defect in the
E-9-1-1 9-1-1 system or inadequacy in the provision of E-9-1-1 9-1-1 service caused
by the telecommunications provider's negligent acts or omissions in developing,
establishing, implementing, maintaining or operating the E-9-1-1 9-1-1 system, up to
a maximum amount for any and all claims arising out of a single occurrence not to
exceed $300,000 or the dollar amount that appears in Title 14, section 8105, subsection
1, whichever is greater; and
B. For property damages, bodily injury or death resulting from any defect in the
E-9-1-1 9-1-1 system or inadequacy in the provision of E-9-1-1 9-1-1 service caused
by the telecommunications provider's intentional, willful or reckless acts or omissions
in developing, establishing, implementing, maintaining or operating the E-9-1-1 9-1-1
system, without limitation on the amount.
For purposes of this subsection, the term "telecommunications provider" means a local
exchange carrier, a commercial mobile service provider, as defined in 47 United States
Code, Section 332(d), or an interconnected voice over Internet protocol service provider an
originating service provider; an employee of a local exchange carrier, commercial mobile
service provider or interconnected voice over Internet protocol service provider originating
service provider acting within the scope of the employee's employment; or an agent of a
local exchange carrier, commercial mobile service provider or interconnected voice over
Internet protocol service provider originating service provider acting within the scope of
the agent's agency.
For purposes of this subsection, the term "E-9-1-1 "9-1-1 system" includes, but is not
limited to, the networks, databases and call processing services necessary to provide
enhanced 9-1-1 services or enhanced 9-1-1 access-only services in accordance with this
chapter and rules adopted under this chapter.
Sec. 31. 25 MRSA §2931, as amended by PL 2019, c. 339, §9, is further amended
by amending the section headnote to read:
§2931. Misuse of E-9-1-1 9-1-1 system
Page 11 - 132LR0556(03)

Sec. 32. 25 MRSA §2931, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2019, c. 339, §9, is further
amended to read:
1. Prohibited use. A person is guilty of misuse of the E-9-1-1 9-1-1 system if without
reasonable cause the person, after having been forbidden to do so by a public safety
answering point manager or administrator or a law enforcement officer:
A. Makes repeated 9-1-1 calls to make nonemergency reports or inquiries;
B. Causes 9-1-1 calls to be made using an alarm or other alerting device that
automatically contacts 9-1-1 and transmits a prerecorded signal or message; or
C. Violates paragraph B after having previously violated paragraph B.
Sec. 33. 25 MRSA §2932, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2021, c. 348, §38, is further
amended to read:
1. Designated emergency telephone number. The primary telephone number to be
used in a telephone exchange to request emergency services following the activation of
E-9-1-1 9-1-1 services for that exchange, including the number for telecommunications
devices for communication for persons who are deaf, hard of hearing or speech impaired,
is 9-1-1. A person may not advertise or promote for emergency response services any
telephone number other than 9-1-1.
Sec. 34. 25 MRSA §2932, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2015, c. 62, §2, is repealed.
Sec. 35. 25 MRSA §2933, as amended by PL 2003, c. 505, §§5 and 6, is further
amended to read:
§2933. Local exchange carrier and originating service provider participation
1. Implementation of E-9-1-1 9-1-1 by local exchange carrier. Each local exchange
carrier offering service over the public switched telephone network, in accordance with
rules and procedures adopted by the bureau Public Utilities Commission, shall implement
the E-9-1-1 9-1-1 system and provide the universal emergency telephone number 9-1-1 for
use by the public in seeking emergency services assistance through the E-9-1-1 9-1-1
system.
2. Required information for E-9-1-1 9-1-1 database. Each local exchange carrier
originating service provider shall provide to the bureau or its designee the automatic
number identification, automatic location identification and any other information required
to establish and maintain the E-9-1-1 9-1-1 database and service services in accordance
with the rules adopted by the bureau Public Utilities Commission.
3. Coordination of E-9-1-1 9-1-1 service; coordinator. Each local exchange carrier
and cellular or wireless telecommunications service provider originating service provider
within the State shall coordinate all implementation, operation and maintenance directly
relating to E-9-1-1 9-1-1 through the bureau and shall designate a primary contact person,
who may delegate the authority to one or more other persons, to coordinate with and
provide all relevant information to the bureau to carry out the purposes of the chapter.
4. Penalties. On petition by the bureau, the The Public Utilities Commission, in an
adjudicatory proceeding, may impose the following administrative penalties for a violation
by a local exchange carrier or an originating service provider of subsection 1 or 2 or any
rules adopted by the bureau Public Utilities Commission implementing subsection 1 or 2:
Page 12 - 132LR0556(03)

A. An administrative penalty of up to $1,000 for each day of the violation; and
B. In extraordinary cases, as determined by the Public Utilities Commission,
revocation of the commission's authorization of the local exchange carrier's originating
service provider's authority to provide local exchange service in this State.
Rules adopted pursuant to this section are routine technical rules pursuant to Title 5,
chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
Sec. 36. 25 MRSA §2934, as amended by PL 2019, c. 339, §10, is further amended
to read:
§2934. Multiline telephone systems
1. Requirements. The bureau Public Utilities Commission may by rule establish
requirements for locating 9-1-1 calls, and initiating emergency responses to such calls,
made from within multiline telephone systems, including network-based or premises-based
systems and voice over Internet protocol systems, whether owned or leased by a public or
private entity, such as private branch exchanges or Centrex systems. Rules adopted
pursuant to this section:
A. May not require any local unit of government to expand or modify its activities so
as to necessitate additional expenditures from local revenues;
B. Apply only to multiline telephone systems installed, introduced, established or
replaced after the effective date of the rules;
C. Must provide for appropriate standards, exemptions and waivers that balance the
benefits of improved methods of locating 9-1-1 calls, and initiating emergency
responses to such calls, made from within multiline telephone systems and the cost of
achieving those improvements. The rules must allow, in appropriate circumstances,
for methods that do not utilize automatic location identification and automatic number
identification standards used in processing 9-1-1 calls; and
D. May establish appropriate technical, procedural or any other standards relating to
multiline telephone systems, telecommunications carrier interconnectivity, databases,
dialing instructions, signaling or other matters necessary or appropriate to carry out the
purposes of this section.
2. Rules. Rules adopted pursuant to this section are major substantive rules as defined
in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A. The bureau may not provisionally adopt any rule
under this section that has not been approved by the Public Utilities Commission.
Sec. 37. 25 MRSA §2935, as enacted by PL 2007, c. 226, §2, is amended to read:
§2935. E-9-1-1 9-1-1 access-only service
1. Provision of E-9-1-1 9-1-1 access-only service. It is the policy of this State that
E-9-1-1 9-1-1 be broadly available where it is economically and technologically practical.
The bureau Public Utilities Commission shall, by rule, establish requirements for the
provision of E-9-1-1 9-1-1 access-only service, including, but not limited to, the
circumstances in which E-9-1-1 9-1-1 access-only service is and is not required and which
telephone service providers are and are not subject to the requirements.
Page 13 - 132LR0556(03)

2. Rulemaking. The bureau Public Utilities Commission shall adopt rules to
implement this section. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are major substantive
routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
Sec. 38. 30-A MRSA §3110, as enacted by PL 2009, c. 477, §1, is amended to read:
§3110. Road-naming disputes
Unless otherwise provided by local ordinance or charter, when there is a dispute over
the naming of a town way, private way or private road for E-9-1-1 9-1-1 purposes, the
decision of the municipal officers is final.
Sec. 39. 30-A MRSA §7062, as enacted by PL 1997, c. 409, §2, is amended by
amending the section headnote to read:
§7062. Enhanced 9-1-1 addressing standards
Sec. 40. 30-A MRSA §7062, first ¶, as enacted by PL 1997, c. 409, §2, is amended
to read:
A plantation may enact an ordinance to establish enhanced 9-1-1 addressing standards
and, pursuant to that ordinance, may:
Sec. 41. 30-A MRSA §7501, sub-§8, as amended by PL 1999, c. 106, §2, is further
amended to read:
8. Enhanced 9-1-1 service. Assigning and maintaining physical addresses
specifically for the purpose of statewide enhanced 9-1-1 service. The county
commissioners may enact an ordinance to establish the addressing standards and, pursuant
to that ordinance, may assign road names to existing and proposed roads and property
numbers to existing and proposed year-round and seasonal dwellings or structures and may
install signs designating road names; and
Sec. 42. 32 MRSA §85-A, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2011, c. 271, §12, is further
amended to read:
4. Licensing actions. A license issued pursuant to this section is subject to the
provisions of sections 90‑A and 91‑A. Before the board or its subcommittee or staff takes
any final action to suspend or revoke an emergency medical dispatch center license or to
refuse to reissue an emergency medical dispatch center license, the board shall contact the
bureau for input on the effect of such an action on the E-9-1-1 9-1-1 system and,
notwithstanding section 91‑B, may, to the extent necessary for this purpose, disclose to the
bureau information that is designated as confidential under section 91‑B.
Sec. 43. 32 MRSA §98, sub-§1, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. GGGGG,
§1, is amended to read:
C. "Historical activations" means the number of times an emergency medical services
entity was dispatched by the E-9-1-1 9-1-1 system within a defined period of time.
Sec. 44. 35-A MRSA §120, sub-§7, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 77, §4, is
amended to read:
A. Title 25, section 2927 2927-A, subsection 5 8;
Page 14 - 132LR0556(03)

Sec. 45. 35-A MRSA §7104-C, sub-§1, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 600, §7
and affected by §10, is amended to read:
C. The statewide prepaid wireless telecommunications service E-9-1-1 9-1-1
surcharge levied on prepaid wireless telecommunications service consumers pursuant
to Title 25, section 2927 2927-A, subsection 1‑F 3.
Sec. 46. 35-A MRSA §7104-C, sub-§2, ¶I, as amended by PL 2017, c. 475, Pt.
A, §59, is further amended by amending subparagraph (1) to read:
(1) The portion of the remitted prepaid wireless fees attributable to the E-9-1-1
9-1-1 surcharge imposed by Title 25, section 2927 2927-A, subsection 1‑F 3 is
deposited in a separate account;
Sec. 47. 35-A MRSA §7201, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 623, Pt. A, §18, is
amended to read:
2. Access to emergency services. "Access to emergency services" means access to
emergency services, as defined in Title 25, section 2921, subsection 5, through 9-1-1 or
enhanced 9-1-1 service, as defined in Title 25, section 2921, subsection 6, to the extent a
local government in the service area of a provider of last resort service provides 9-1-1 or
enhanced 9-1-1 services.
Sec. 48. 36 MRSA §191, sub-§2, ¶JJJ, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 401, Pt. E, §1
and reallocated by RR 2019, c. 1, Pt. A, §56, is amended to read:
JJJ. The disclosure of information to an authorized representative of the Public Utilities
Commission for use in the commission's administration and oversight of the E‑9‑1‑1
9-1-1 funding under Title 25, section 2927 2927-A, the state universal service fund
under Title 35‑A, section 7104 and the telecommunications education access fund
under Title 35‑A, section 7104‑B. The assessor shall apprise the authorized
representative of the provisions regarding confidentiality of such information and of
the continuing confidential nature of the disclosed information.
Sec. 49. 39-A MRSA §201, sub-§3-A, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 405, Pt. A,
§143, is further amended to read:
B. The employee is a law enforcement officer, corrections officer, E-9-1-1 9-1-1
dispatcher, firefighter or emergency medical services person and is diagnosed by an
allopathic physician or an osteopathic physician licensed under Title 32, chapter 48 or
chapter 36, respectively, with a specialization in psychiatry or a psychologist licensed
under Title 32, chapter 56 as having post-traumatic stress disorder that resulted from
work stress, that the work stress was extraordinary and unusual compared with that
experienced by the average employee and the work stress and not some other source
of stress was the predominant cause of the post-traumatic stress disorder, in which case
the post-traumatic stress disorder is presumed to have arisen out of and in the course
of the worker's employment. This presumption may be rebutted by clear and
convincing evidence to the contrary. For purposes of this paragraph, "law enforcement
officer," "corrections officer," "firefighter" and "emergency medical services person"
have the same meaning as in section 328‑A, subsection 1. For the purposes of this
paragraph, "E-9-1-1 "9-1-1 dispatcher" means a person who receives calls made to the
E-9-1-1 9-1-1 system and dispatches emergency services. "E-9-1-1 "9-1-1 dispatcher"
Page 15 - 132LR0556(03)

includes an emergency medical dispatcher as defined in Title 32, chapter 2‑B, section
85‑A, subsection 1, paragraph D.
Each time the Legislature amends this paragraph to provide for a rebuttable
presumption for a new category of employees, the board shall submit a report to the
joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over labor matters no
later than the January 1st after the 5th year of the addition of the category of employees
and no later than the January 1st after the 10th year of the addition of the category of
employees. The reports must include an analysis of the number of claims brought under
this paragraph, the portion of those claims that resulted in a settlement or award of
benefits and the effect of the provisions of this paragraph on costs to the State and its
subdivisions. The Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Bureau of
Human Resources and the Department of Public Safety shall assist the board in
developing the reports, and the board shall seek the input of an association whose
membership consists exclusively of counties, municipalities and other political or
administrative subdivisions in the development of the report.
This paragraph is repealed October 1, 2025.
Page 16 - 132LR0556(03)